src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_NIAMEN !! niamen:n%{iaeo%}%{ae0%}m
!! Strong verb class 4a,b

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^ABL1S%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^ABL1S%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^ABL2U ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^ABL2U%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^ABL2U ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^ABL2U%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^ABL2U%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^ABL2U%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%^ABL3%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;


LEXICON V_STEAKEN !! steaken:st%{eia%}%{ae0%}k
!! Strong verb class 5

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^ABL1S%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^ABL1S%>t ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>et ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^ABL2U ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^ABL2U%>st ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^ABL2U ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^ABL2U%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^ABL2U%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^ABL2U%>en ENDLEX ;

+V+Inf:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>en ENDLEX ;
+V+PrsPrc:%>end ENDLEX ;

+V+Imprt+Sg2: ENDLEX ;
+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>et ENDLEX ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
