src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
dreapen:dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p V_NIAMEN ;
niamen:n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m V_NIAMEN ;
dreapen:dr%{eia%}%{aeØ%}p V_STEAKEN ;
eaten:%{eia%}%{aeØ%}t V_STEAKEN ;
geaten:g%{eia%}%{aeØ%}t V_STEAKEN ;
giaven:g%{iae%}%{aeØ%}v V_STEAKEN ;
leasen:l%{eia%}%{aeØ%}s V_STEAKEN ;
meaten:m%{eia%}%{aeØ%}t V_STEAKEN ;
pleagen:pl%{eia%}%{aeØ%}g V_STEAKEN ;
steaken:st%{eia%}%{aeØ%}k V_STEAKEN ;
treaden:tr%{eia%}%{aeØ%}d V_STEAKEN ;
weagen:w%{eia%}%{aeØ%}g V_STEAKEN ;
